Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.300.295

Identified programs—Grants for in-service training and instructional materials.

The superintendent of public instruction shall establish a grant program to provide incentives for teachers, schools, and school districts to use the identified programs on the approved list in grades kindergarten through four. Schools, school districts, and educational service districts may apply for grants. Funds for the grants shall be used for in-service training and instructional materials. Grants shall be awarded and funds distributed not later than June 30, 1997, for programs in the 1996-97 and 1997-98 school years. Priority shall be given to grant applications involving schools and school districts with the lowest mean percentile scores on the statewide third grade test required under *RCW 28A.230.190 among grant applicants.

[ 1999 c 78 s 2; 1996 c 273 s 2.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 28A.230.190 was repealed by 2005 c 217 s 3.

Effective date—1996 c 273: See note following RCW 28A.300.290.